Connecticut, session 2026, SB00391.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Commissioner of
Correction, when providing medical care for the screening, diagnosis
and treatment of breast cancer to any woman committed to the custody
of the Department of Correction, may arrange for such screening,
diagnostic and treatment services to be provided by a health care
institution, licensed in accordance with the provisions of chapter 368v
of the general statutes, that is in closer proximity to the correctional
facility than The University of Connecticut Health Center. In the event
the commissioner is unable to provide a required diagnostic and
screening mammogram, as defined in section 38a-503 of the general
statutes, to a woman committed to the custody of the commissioner on-
site at the correctional facility, the commissioner may then arrange for
the provision of such mammogram at a health care institution that is in
closer proximity to the correctional facility than The University of
Connecticut Health Center.

Senate Bill No. 391
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-117 2 of 2